West Virginia, session 2026, SB972.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-802b. Educational placement protections during abuse or neglect investigations. (a) Purpose. — The purpose of this section is to ensure the continued visibility, safety, and welfare of children who are the subject of a pending child abuse or neglect investigation by the Department of Human Services.(b) Temporary restriction. — When a child is the subject of a pending investigation of abuse or neglect pursuant to this article, and the alleged perpetrator is a custodial parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child’s care:(1) The alleged perpetrator may not initiate withdrawal of the child from a public school, public charter school, or private school for the purpose of providing home instruction; and(2) The alleged perpetrator may not assume or resume responsibility as the primary provider of home instruction for the child.(c) Duration. — The restriction set forth in subsection (b) of this section shall apply only during the pendency of the investigation and shall terminate upon:(1) A written determination by the Department of Human Services that the investigation is unfounded or closed without substantiation; or(2) An order of a circuit court or family court directing otherwise.(d) Court authority. — Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a court to order an alternative educational placement or instructional arrangement when necessary to protect the best interests of the child.(e) Construction. — This section:(1) Does not create a presumption of guilt;(2) Does not permanently restrict home instruction; and(3) Shall be narrowly construed to protect child safety during active investigations.(f) Notice. — Upon the initiation of an investigation that triggers this section, the Department shall provide written notice to the child’s school and custodial parent or guardian of the temporary restriction.